Florida, session 2026, HB4069.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 12 of section 2 of chapter 98-501, Laws
of Florida, as amended, is amended to read:
Section 12. Taxation.—
a. The board of commissioners of the district is
authorized to levy taxes on land only and not upon any
improvements thereon within the district up to and including 1
mill 5 mills per dollar of taxable assessed valuation. In the
absence of any contrary action of the board of commissioners
acting as a budget commission as herein provided, the tax rate
of each calendar year shall be at the maximum provided herein.
b. Such taxes as provided herein and as may be determined
to be necessary by the board of commissioners, acting as budget
commission for the district for the operation of the affairs of
the district, shall be certified to the Property Appraiser of
Broward County, by the board of commissioners of Central Broward
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4069-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 4069 2026
Water Control District, and shall be placed upon the tax rolls
of Broward County, by the property appraiser, and shall be
collected by the Revenue Collector of Broward County, as now
provided by law, and such taxes so levied shall become a lien
under the law against the property within the boundaries of the
Central Broward Water Control District and enforceable under the
laws of the State of Florida pertaining to the Central Broward
Water Control District.
Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4069-01-c1